California, session 20252026, AB2454.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 91.1 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:91.1. (a) (1) The department, in collaboration with the commission, shall prepare a report to assess the services provided by the department to maintain and improve the state highway system, and the needs of state highway infrastructure, in the southeast portion of the County of Los Angeles. The department shall submit the report to the Legislature, and post the report on its internet website, on or before February 1, 2028.(2) The report shall include recommendations on how to improve both of the following in the southeast portion of the County of Los Angeles:(A) State highway infrastructure and the department’s services with regard to the state highway system, including clean-up and maintenance services.(B) The department’s communications and engagement with local governments regarding the maintenance and improvement of the state highway system.(b) In preparing the report, the department shall provide an opportunity for the public to comment on the topic of the report through the department’s internet website.(c) In preparing the report, the department is encouraged to do both of the following:(1) Conduct outreach with relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, local governments, community-based organizations, environmental justice and equity-based organizations, organized labor, the transportation industry, metropolitan planning organizations, county transportation commissions, regional transportation planning agencies, and transit operators.(2) Hold a public workshop in the southeast portion of the County of Los Angeles.(d) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is inoperative on February 1, 2032, and is repealed on January 1, 2033.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique transportation needs in the County of Los Angeles.SECTION 1.Section 91 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:91.The department shall improve and maintain the state highways, including all traversable highways that have been adopted or designated as state highways by the commission, as provided in this code.